Utah statutes.
59-12-1802.   State sales and use tax -- Base -- Rate -- Revenues deposited into General Fund.

(1)  If a county does not impose a tax under Part 11, County Option Sales and Use Tax, a tax shall be imposed within the county under this section by the state:

(a)  on the transactions described in Subsection 59-12-103(1);

(b)  at a rate of .25%; and

(c)  beginning on January 1, 2008, and ending on the day on which the county imposes a tax under Part 11, County Option Sales and Use Tax.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a tax under this section may not be imposed on the sales and uses described in Section 59-12-104 to the extent the sales and uses are exempt from taxation under Section 59-12-104.

(3)  For purposes of Subsection (1), the location of a transaction shall be determined in accordance with Sections 59-12-211 through 59-12-215.

(4)  Revenues collected from the sales and use tax imposed by this section, after subtracting amounts a seller retains in accordance with Section 59-12-108, shall be deposited into the General Fund.

